Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1048.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 62WATER AND SEWER PROJECTSSec.6201. Definitions.6202. Private sewer lateral and private water lateral projects.§ 6201. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Municipality." A city, borough, incorporated town or 1234567891011121314151617 township in this Commonwealth."Private sewer lateral." A line on a property upon which a building or structure is located that connects to a public sewer system."Private water lateral." A line on a property upon which a building or structure is located that connects to a public water supply system.§ 6202. Private sewer lateral and private water lateral projects.(a) Replacement or remediation.--A municipality may perform the replacement or remediation of a private sewer lateral or private water lateral for residents of the municipality if the municipality determines that the replacement or remediation will benefit the public health, public water supply system or public sewer system. A municipality that has performed a replacement or remediation authorized under this subsection may not be deemed to be the owner of a private sewer lateral or private water lateral and may not be required to perform any other duties unless determined necessary by the municipality.(b) Public money and municipal employees.-- A municipality may use public money or municipal employees for the replacement or remediation of a private sewer lateral or private water lateral if the municipality determines that the replacement or remediation will benefit the public health, public water supply system or public sewer system. Before using public money or municipal employees as authorized under this subsection, the municipality shall consider the availability of public money, equipment, municipal employees and facilities and the competing demands of the municipality for the public funds, equipment, municipal employees and facilities.20250HB1048PN1651 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Construction and maintenance.--A municipality may construct and maintain water or sanitary sewer pump stations, public water distribution systems, public sewer collection systems or similar general construction services within the municipality.(C) PRIORITIZATION.--(1) A MUNICIPALITY SHALL USE BEST EFFORTS TO UTILIZE SUPPLIES MADE OR ASSEMBLED IN THE UNITED STATES IN THE REPLACEMENT OR REMEDIATION AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (A). IF A MUNICIPALITY DETERMINES A PARTICULAR SUPPLY IS NOT MADE OR ASSEMBLED IN THE UNITED STATES, OR IS MADE OR ASSEMBLED IN THE UNITED STATES BUT NOT AVAILABLE IN SUFFICIENT QUANTITIES TO MEET THE NEEDS AND TIME OF THE WORK AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (A), THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE MUNICIPALITY MUST ADOPT A RESOLUTION STATING THE DETERMINATION AND WAIVING THE REQUIREMENT FOR THE SUPPLY. THE RESOLUTION SHALL STATE WHAT ACTION THE MUNICIPALITY HAS TAKEN TO COMPLY WITH THIS PARAGRAPH.(2) IF THE REPLACEMENT OR REMEDIATION AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (A), OR A PORTION THEREOF IS CONTRACTED, THE CONTRACT TERMS SHALL INCLUDE USING BEST EFFORTS TO UTILIZE SUPPLIES MADE OR ASSEMBLED IN THE UNITED STATES. IF A PERSON THAT BIDS FOR A CONTRACT DETERMINES A PARTICULAR SUPPLY IS NOT MADE OR ASSEMBLED IN THE UNITED STATES, OR IS MADE OR ASSEMBLED IN THE UNITED STATES BUT NOT AVAILABLE IN SUFFICIENT QUANTITIES TO MEET THE NEEDS AND TIME OF THE CONTRACT, THE CONTRACT SHALL INCLUDE AN ATTESTATION STATING THE DETERMINATION.(D) CONSTRUCTION.--NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO SUPERSEDE, WAIVE OR PROVIDE AN EXCEPTION TO A LAW 20250HB1048PN1651 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REQUIRING COMPETITIVE BIDDING IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.(E) PROHIBITION.--THE PROVISIONS OF 65 PA.C.S. § 1103 (RELATING TO RESTRICTED ACTIVITIES) SHALL APPLY TO AN ACTION TAKEN UNDER THIS SECTION.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1048PN1651 - 4 - 12345